src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-avaltymasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - авалтымаш: # Noun 'being covered'

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom: авалтымаш
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: авалтымашем
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/at: авалтымашат
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Gen: авалтымашын
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Dat: авалтымашлан
     авалтымаш+N+Pl+Nom: [авалтымаш-влак, авалтымаш-шамыч]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [авалтымашыже, авалтымашше, авалтымашыж]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine: [авалтымашыште, авалтымаште]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ill: [авалтымашышке, авалтымашке, авалтымашыш]

     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Poss: авалтымашемже
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Poss: авалтымашетше
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Poss: [авалтымашыжыже, авалтымашшыже]
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Poss: авалтымашнаже
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Poss: авалтымашдаже
     авалтымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Poss: авалтымашыштше
